Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.395

Voluntary donations for purpose of supporting hunger programs.

(1) Municipal utilities under this chapter may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purpose of supporting hunger programs.

(2) Voluntary donations collected by municipal utilities under this section must be used by the municipal utility to support the maintenance and operation of hunger programs.

(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

(4) Nothing in this section precludes a municipal utility from requesting voluntary donations to support other programs.

[ 2011 c 226 s 2.]